Maryland, session 2026, SB0022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
7–114.
(b) The Department shall oversee and administer the following programs and
units:
(1) constituent services and ombudsmen programs;
(2) the Assistive Technology Guaranteed Loan Program under Subtitle 6
of this title;
(3) the Office of Personal Assistance Services, including the Attendant
Care Program under Subtitle 4 of this title;
(4) Telecommunications Access of Maryland under Subtitle 8 of this title;
(5) Telecommunications Devices and Distribution of Accessible
Information for Disabled Individuals under Subtitle 9 of this title;
(6) the Office of Disability Employment Advancement and Policy; [and]
(7) the Maryland Assistive Technology Program under Subtitle 14 of this
title; AND
(8) AFFORDABLE AND ACCESSIBLE HOUSING PROGRAMS.
7–117.
(A) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–114 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT
MAY ESTABLISH ONE OR MORE AFFILIATED FOUNDATIONS TO WORK WITH THE
MARYLAND ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM, THE ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY
GUARANTEED LOAN PROGRAM, THE OFFICE OF DISABILITY EMPLOYMENT

SENATE BILL 22 3
ADVANCEMENT AND POLICY, AND THE DEPARTMENT’S AFFORDABLE AND
ACCESSIBLE HOUSING PROGRAMS.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION IS TO:
(1) SOLICIT AND ACCEPT FUNDS AND PARTNER WITH INDIVIDUALS,
CORPORATIONS, AND OTHER ENTITIES TO SUPPORT INNOVATIVE PROJECTS
DESIGNED TO MAINTAIN, EXPAND, AND ENHANCE THE PROGRAMS AND UNITS
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PROMOTE ACTIVITIES THAT:
(I) ENHANCE AWARENESS OF, ACCESS TO, AND EFFECTIVE USE
OF ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY, ACCESSIBLE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, AND
ENVIRONMENTAL ADAPTATIONS THAT ALLOW INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES TO
PARTICIPATE IN EMPLOYMENT, EDUCATION, HOUSING, TRANSPORTATION, PUBLIC
SAFETY, RECREATION, HEALTH CARE, AND OTHER ASPECTS OF DAILY LIFE;
(II) SUPPORT TRAINING, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, AND
REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS THAT PROMOTE THE HIRING AND RETENTION OF
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES IN PRIVATE AND PUBLIC SECTOR EMPLOYMENT;
AND
(III) CREATE OPPORTUNITIES FOR INTEGRATED, AFFORDABLE,
AND ACCESSIBLE HOUSING FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES TO LIVE IN THE
COMMUNITIES OF THEIR CHOICE.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP POLICIES FOR OPERATING EACH AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES, INCLUDING THE AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION NAME; AND
(II) SUBMIT EACH POLICY DEVELOPED TO THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION FOR REVIEW AND, IF
APPROPRIATE, APPROVAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE POLICIES THE DEPARTMENT DEVELOPS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR FORM AND LEGAL SUFFICIENCY;
AND

SENATE BILL 22
(II) IF APPROPRIATE, APPROVE THE POLICIES FOR USE IN
GOVERNING THE DEPARTMENT’S RELATIONSHIP WITH THE AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION.
(3) THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE POLICIES THE DEPARTMENT DEVELOPS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT PERTAIN TO CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST; AND
(II) IF APPROPRIATE, APPROVE THE POLICIES FOR USE IN
GOVERNING AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT WHO ALSO SERVES
AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(D) (1) AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION MAY SOLICIT AND RECEIVE
CONTRIBUTIONS FROM BUSINESSES, GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES, NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS, AND INDIVIDUALS INTERESTED IN THE PROMOTION OF PROGRAMS
AND UNITS ADMINISTERED OR SUPPORTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–113 OF THIS SUBTITLE AUTHORIZING
THE SECRETARY TO RECEIVE FUNDS FROM ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SOURCE TO
CARRY OUT THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT, THE SECRETARY
SHALL RECEIVE AND DEPOSIT FUNDS FROM AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION INTO A
SEPARATE SPECIAL FUND.
(E) (1) AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT:
(I) BE CONSIDERED AN AGENCY OR INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE
STATE OR A UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH FOR ANY PURPOSE;
(II) MAKE, INFLUENCE, OR PARTICIPATE IN DETERMINATIONS
REGARDING ELIGIBILITY FOR ANY PROGRAM, BENEFIT, OR SERVICES ADMINISTERED
OR SUPPORTED BY THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(III) ESTABLISH, INFLUENCE, OR IMPLEMENT PUBLIC POLICY,
PROGRAM STANDARDS, PRIORITIES, OR ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) A FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR LIABILITY OF AN AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A DEBT
OR AN OBLIGATION OF THE STATE OR THE DEPARTMENT.

SENATE BILL 22 5
(F) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING §§ 5–501 THROUGH 5–504 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE, AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT MAY
BECOME A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT WHO SERVES
AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) MAY NOT BE COMPENSATED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, BY
THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION; AND
(II) MAY BE REIMBURSED FOR BONA FIDE EXPENSES INCURRED
IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ACTIVITIES UNDERTAKEN ON BEHALF OF THE
AFFILIATED FOUNDATION AS AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND THE BOARD
OF DIRECTORS OF THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE ETHICS
COMMISSION IN WRITING WHENEVER THE DEPARTMENT ALLOWS AN OFFICIAL OR
EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT TO SERVE AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN
AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION SHALL
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ANY OBJECTIONS OR CONCERNS PERTAINING TO THE
JOINT SERVICE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE.
(III) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTICE FROM THE STATE ETHICS
COMMISSION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL REEXAMINE THE JOINT SERVICE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE.
(4) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR, THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, AND THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION ON:
(I) THE NAMES OF THE OFFICIALS AND EMPLOYEES SERVING
AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION; AND
(II) HOW THE POLICIES ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN IMPLEMENTED IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.

SENATE BILL 22
(G) (1) EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HIRE AN INDEPENDENT
CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT TO:
(I) AUDIT AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(II) SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT A REPORT ON THE AUDIT OF
THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IF AN
AFFILIATED FOUNDATION HAS NOT BEEN AUDITED WITHIN THE PAST YEAR:
(I) THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION MAY NOT SOLICIT AND
RECEIVE CONTRIBUTIONS; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ACCEPT CONTRIBUTIONS
FROM THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(H) CONTRIBUTIONS ACCEPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT FROM AN
AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION ARE SUPPLEMENTAL
TO AND ARE NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE
WOULD BE APPROPRIATED IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL OR CAPITAL BUDGET BILL
FOR THE DEPARTMENT.
(I) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR RESTRICT THE
AUTHORITY OF THE DEPARTMENT OR OTHER AUTHORIZED GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITIES TO DETERMINE ELIGIBILITY OR MAKE POLICY DECISIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.